Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 517.04, is amended to read: 517.04 PERSONS AUTHORIZED TO PERFORM CIVIL MARRIAGES. new text begin (a) new text end Civil marriages may be solemnized throughout the statenew text begin by any mode recognized in section 517.18 ornew text end by an individual who has attained the age of 21 years andnew text begin whonew text end isnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a judge of a court of recorddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ornew text end a retired judge of a court of recorddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end a court administratordeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ornew text end a retired court administrator with the approval of the chief judge of the judicial districtdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3)new text end a former court commissioner who is employed by the court system or is acting pursuant to an order of the chief judge of the commissioner's judicial districtdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (4)new text end the residential school superintendent of the Minnesota State Academy for the Deaf and the Minnesota State Academy for the Blinddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5)new text end a licensed or ordained minister of any religious denominationdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6) a current member of the senate or the house of representatives; or new text end new text begin (7)new text end an individual who registers as a civil marriage officiant with a local registrar in a county of this statedeleted text begin , or by any mode recognized in section 517.18deleted text end . new text begin (b)new text end For purposes of this section, a court of record includes the Office of Administrative Hearings under section 14.48. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end